Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-1121
Attorney General; powers.

(1) If the Attorney General has reasonable cause to believe that a controller or processor has engaged in or is engaging in a violation of the Data Privacy Act, the Attorney General may issue a civil investigative demand pursuant to section 87-1123.

(2) The Attorney General may request, pursuant to a civil investigative demand, that a controller disclose any data protection assessment that is relevant to an investigation conducted by the Attorney General. The Attorney General may evaluate the data protection assessment for compliance with sections 87-1112 to 87-1114.

Laws 2024, LB1074, § 21.
January 1, 2025